Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-682
Violations; traffic infraction.

Unless otherwise declared in the Nebraska Rules of the Road with respect to particular offenses, a violation of any provision of the rules shall constitute a traffic infraction.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 102;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-6,102;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 178.

General penalty, see section 60-689.

Operator's license, assessment of points, revocation, see section 60-4,182 et seq.

Prosecution of a traffic infraction is a misdemeanor criminal proceeding authorizing a non-lawyer associate judge of the county court to preside in any such proceeding. Miller v. Peterson, 208 Neb. 658, 305 N.W.2d 364 (1981).

Prosecution for a traffic infraction is a criminal action. State v. Knoles, 199 Neb. 211, 256 N.W.2d 873 (1977).

Held, contributory negligence no defense where defendant's negligence was sole proximate cause of intersection accident. Bonnes v. Olson, 197 Neb. 309, 248 N.W.2d 756 (1976).

A motorist commits a traffic infraction by driving on a road marked with a road closed barricade and sign, thus giving an officer probable cause to stop the vehicle. State v. Morrissey, 19 Neb. App. 590, 810 N.W.2d 195 (2012).